Maine, session 132, LD1321.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3209-A, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 478, Pt. A,
§3, is amended to read:
C. "Net energy billing" means a billing and metering practice under which a customer
is billed on the basis of the difference between the supply charges for the kilowatt‑hours
delivered by a transmission and distribution utility to the customer over a billing period
and the credit amount for kilowatt‑hours delivered by the customer to the transmission
and distribution utility over the billing period, taking into account accumulated unused
kilowatt‑hour credits from the previous billing period.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3209-A, sub-§1, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. "Renewable energy credit" has the same meaning as in section 3210, subsection 2,
paragraph B-2.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3209-A, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Applicability to projects of more than 20 kilowatts. After November 1, 2025,
unless the entity proposing the development of a distributed generation resource is granted
a good-cause exemption due to external delays in accordance with subsection 7 or 9, a
distributed generation resource may not be used for net energy billing under this section if
the nameplate capacity of the distributed generation resource is more than 20 kilowatts.
A. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the number of
customers or meters is limited to 10 for a shared financial interest in a distributed
generation resource participating in net energy billing pursuant to this subsection.
B. A customer participating in net energy billing pursuant to this subsection may not,
at one time, have a financial interest in more than 5 distributed generation resources
that have net energy billing arrangements.
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §3209-A, sub-§11 is enacted to read:
11. Net energy billing termination. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, a person may not participate or, if participating, may no longer participate, in net
energy billing under this section after the earlier of:
A. Twenty years from the date a net energy billing agreement between the entity
proposing the development of the distributed generation resource and the transmission
and distribution utility was executed; and
B. December 31, 2045.
Sec. 5. 35-A MRSA §3209-A, sub-§12 is enacted to read:
12. Renewable energy credits; sale required. A project sponsor, owner of a
distributed generation resource or other entity operating a distributed generation resource
with a net energy billing arrangement under this section shall sell any renewable energy
credits generated by the distributed generation resource and may not sell outside of the
State any renewable energy credits generated by the distributed generation resource.
Sec. 6. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, sub-§5, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 659, §19,
is further amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR1649(01)

A. The tariff rate for a customer participating in net energy billing with a distributed
generation resource described in this paragraph must equal the standard-offer service
supply rate established under section 3212 that is applicable to the customer receiving
the credit plus 75% of the effective transmission and distribution rate for the rate class
that includes the smallest commercial customers of the investor-owned transmission
and distribution utility. The tariff rate under this paragraph applies to net energy billing
with a distributed generation resource:
(1) With a nameplate capacity of greater than one megawatt if:
(a) The entity developing the distributed generation resource certifies by
affidavit with accompanying documentation to the commission that the entity,
before September 1, 2022, commenced on-site physical work of a significant
nature on the distributed generation resource and the entity has made and will
continue to make continuous on-site construction efforts to advance toward
completion of the distributed generation resource. For the purpose of this
paragraph, continuous on-site construction efforts include, but are not limited
to, in the context of a solar facility, the continuous installation of racks or other
structures to affix photovoltaic panels, collectors or solar cells to a site. The
commission may share information contained in the affidavit submitted in
accordance with this paragraph with a transmission and distribution utility, as
necessary, to verify a distributed generation resource's compliance with this
section. In administering this subsection, the commission may adopt rules
including, but not limited to, requiring the entity that submits a sworn affidavit
under this subparagraph to provide updated documentation to the commission
after submission of the affidavit; or
(b) The distributed generation resource is collocated with a net energy billing
customer that is or net energy billing customers that are subscribed to at least
50% of the facility's output; or
(2) With a nameplate capacity of one megawatt or less.
Sec. 7. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, sub-§5, ¶A-1, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 659, §19,
is amended to read:
A-1. The tariff rate for a customer participating in net energy billing under this section
with a distributed generation resource not governed by paragraph A must: equal the
standard-offer service supply rate established pursuant to section 3212 that was
applicable to the rate class of the customer receiving the credit on December 31, 2020.
(1) In 2022, equal the standard-offer service rate established pursuant to section
3212 that was applicable to the rate class of the customer receiving the credit on
December 31, 2020 plus 75% of the effective transmission and distribution rate
that was in effect on December 31, 2020 for the rate class that includes the smallest
commercial customers of the investor-owned transmission and distribution utility;
and
(2) Increase by 2.25% on January 1st of each subsequent year, beginning January
1, 2023.
Sec. 8. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
Page 2 - 132LR1649(01)

9. Net energy billing termination. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, a person may not participate or, if participating, may no longer participate, in net
energy billing under this section after the earlier of:
A. Twenty years from the date a net energy billing agreement between the entity
proposing the development of the distributed generation resource and the transmission
and distribution utility was executed; and
B. December 31, 2045.
Sec. 9. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Renewable energy credits; sale required. An owner or operator of a distributed
generation resource with a net energy billing arrangement under this section shall sell any
renewable energy credits generated by the distributed generation resource and may not sell
outside of the State any renewable energy credits generated by the distributed generation
resource.